Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-310
Mineral rights; lease; entry by state; when authorized.

The right of the state, or its authorized agents, to enter upon its own lands, and to remove therefrom any substances necessary for road construction, or in structures of public buildings, or other public or general purposes, shall not be denied or abridged by any lease granted hereunder.

Laws 1918, Thirty-sixth Spec. Sess., c. 7, § 10, p. 46;

C.S.1922, § 5228;

C.S.1929, § 72-310;

R.S.1943, § 72-310.